Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-1601
Act, how cited.

Sections 57-1601 to 57-1626 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 5.
April 8, 2026